Hawaii statutes.
§448E-2 Board; appointment. There is
established the board of electricians and plumbers consisting of seven
members. Two of the members shall be engaged in the electrical trade and two
of the members shall be engaged in the plumbing trade. Three of the members
shall be private citizens not connected with the industry. [L 1971, c 183, pt
of §1; am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1992, c 202, §79]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next